Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2605
Record requirements.

The records required by sections 60-2602 to 60-2604 shall be maintained for any vehicle of any model year, but records of major component parts shall be maintained only with respect to major component parts of vehicles five model years or less in age on the date of acquisition. The board may by rule and regulation, exempt vehicles or major component parts of vehicles from all or a portion of the record-keeping requirements, based upon the age of the vehicle or part if the board deems that such requirements would serve no substantial value.

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 25.